src/morphology/affixes/particles.lexc
!! Particles

!! The MOKSHA language particles ...

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PARTICLES 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PCLE_АВА !!= @CODE@ Is a model word necessary here?
+Pcle: # ;

LEXICON PCLE_
+Pcle: # ;


LEXICON Pcle-Compar-Stnd
+Pcle+Compar: # ;

LEXICON PCLE-EPIST
+Pcle+Epist: # ;

LEXICON PCLE-NEG
+Pcle+Neg: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg-Contrast
+Pcle+Neg+Intensive: # ;

LEXICON PCLE-SUPERL
+Pcle+Superl: # ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
